Missouri, session 2026, HB2564.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 565, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 565.097, to read as follows:
565.097. 1. A person commits the offense of masked intimidation if that person
intentionally harasses, intimidates, or threatens any other person or group of persons
while hiding or concealing his or her face with a mask or any other article or device for
the purpose of concealing his or her identity and with the intent to place another person
or group of persons in reasonable fear for their physical safety.
2. A person who commits the offense of masked intimidation shall be guilty of a
class E felony for the first offense, a class D felony for the second offense, and a class C
felony for a third or subsequent offense.
3. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Harass", to engage in a knowing and willful pattern of conduct directed at a
particular person or particular group of persons that is intended to cause that person or
that group of persons to reasonably fear for their safety or suffer substantial emotional
distress;
(2) "Intimidate", to willfully and substantially interfere, by threats,
intimidation, or coercion, with the exercise or enjoyment by any other person or
persons of rights secured by the constitution or laws of the United States, or of rights
secured by the constitution or laws of the state of Missouri, because of that person or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2564 2
person’s actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin, ethnicity, sex, gender,
gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, or disability;
(3) "Threaten", to communicate a clear intention to cause imminent bodily
harm to another person.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person or persons wearing
a mask or otherwise covering one's face for any purpose other than a purpose specified
in subsection 1 of this section, in cases where a person is:
(1) Wearing a mask or face covering on or near the occasion of a holiday,
celebration, or other event involving costumes;
(2) Wearing a mask, hood, article, or other device for the purpose of ensuring
the physical safety of the wearer or because of the nature of the person's occupation,
trade, or profession;
(3) Wearing a mask, hood, article, or other device for the purpose of protection
from the weather elements or while participating in a winter sport;
(4) Wearing a mask, hood, article, or other device in an artistic or theatrical
production or celebration;
(5) Wearing a gas mask or other protective facial covering for the purposes of
protection during or related to an emergency situation, or during emergency
management drills;
(6) Wearing a mask for the purpose of ensuring one's physical health and safety
or the health and safety of others, including, but not limited to, limiting the spread of
airborne illnesses; or
(7) Wearing any garb for religious purposes.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or infringe upon any
right protected under the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or
any right protected under the constitution of Missouri.
✔